Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.170

Aid vehicles—Personnel—Use.

The aid vehicle shall be operated in accordance with standards promulgated by the secretary, by at least one person holding a certificate recognized under RCW 18.73.120.

The aid vehicle may be used for transportation of patients only when it is impossible or impractical to obtain an ambulance or when a wait for arrival of an ambulance would place the life of the patient in jeopardy. If so used, the vehicle shall be under the command of a person holding a certificate recognized pursuant to RCW 18.73.081 other than the driver.

[ 1987 c 214 s 12; 1979 ex.s. c 261 s 17; 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 208: See RCW 18.73.910.